da: Kompatibilitet mellem pedaler og klamper: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universal; Andet
cs: Kompatibilita pedálů a zarážek: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Univerzální; Ostatní
hu: Pedál- és stoplirendszer-kompatibilitás: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Univerzális; Egyéb
de: Kompatibilität mit Pedal- und Cleat-Systemen: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universal; Sonstige
nb: Kompatibilitet med pedal- og klossystem: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universell; Annet
zh-TW: 踏板與卡鞋鎖片系統相容性: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; 通用; 其他
fr: Compatibilité avec les systèmes de pédales et de cales: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universel; Autre
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของระบบบันไดและคลีท: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
tr: Pedal ve kilit sistemi uyumluluğu: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Evrensel; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljivost sistema pedalov in kolesarskih ploščic: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Univerzalno; Drugo
pl: Kompatybilność z systemem pedałów i bloków: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Uniwersalne; Inne
vi: Khả năng tương thích giữa bàn đạp và hệ thống kẹp: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Phổ biến; Khác
lt-LT: Pedalų ir klipsų sistemos suderinamumas: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universalus; Kita
fi: Poljin- ja klossijärjestelmän yhteensopivuus: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost sustava pedala i kopački: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Univerzalno; Ostalo
es: Compatibilidad con sistemas de pedales y calas: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universal; Otro
it: Compatibilità del sistema di pedali e tacchetti: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universale; Altro
en: Pedal and cleat system compatibility: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universal; Other
sv: Kompatibilitet mellan pedal och skoklossystem: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universell; Övrigt
ru: Совместимость педалей и шипов: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Универсальная; Другое
ja: ペダルとクリートシステムの互換性: カンパニョーロ; クランクブラザーズ; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; スピードプレイ; Time ATAC; ユニバーサル; その他
ro-RO: Compatibilitate între sistemul de pedale și cleme: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universal; Altele
el: Συμβατότητα συστήματος πεντάλ και σχαρών: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
ko: 페달 및 클릿 시스템 호환성: 캄파놀로; 크랭크브라더스; 룩 델타; 룩 케오; SPD; SPD-SL; 스피드플레이; 타임 ATAC; 범용; 기타
zh-CN: 踏板与锁踏系统适配性: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; 通用; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilita s pedálmi a kuframi: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Univerzálne; Iné
bg-BG: Съвместимост на система педал и автомати: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Универсална; Други
nl: Pedaal- en schoenplaatjessysteem compatibiliteit: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universeel; Overig
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com pedais e sistemas de encaixe: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universal; Outro
pt-BR: Pedal e taco sistema compatibilidade: Campagnolo; Crankbrothers; Look Delta; Look Keo; SPD; SPD-SL; Speedplay; Time ATAC; Universal; Outro